Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-513
Aid to dependent children; standard of need; adjustment; limitation.

The standard of need for aid to dependent children payments shall be adjusted on July 1 of every second year beginning July 1, 1997. The adjustment shall be made on the basis of the rate of growth of the Consumer Price Index as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the two previous calendar years. The aid to dependent children payment made shall not be greater than the amount specified by section 43-512.

Laws 1995, LB 455, § 19.